District of Columbia statutes.
33-431

Repealed

Dissolution — Decree of court.

Repealed.

Sept. 27, 1962, 76 Stat. 642, Pub. L. 87-709, § 32
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1203, 44 DCR 777
1973 Ed., § 41-331.
1981 Ed., § 41-131.